Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1714
Violations; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Any person violating section 48-1711 or 48-1712 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who (a) intentionally defaces, alters, or changes a farm labor contractor license, (b) uses the license of another, (c) knowingly permits the use of another person's license, or (d) acts as a farm labor contractor without a license shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 14.